Massachusetts, session 194th, H1504.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all mobile
homes shall qualify as affordable housing as defined by Chapter 40B of the General Laws.
of 1